California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(d) “Qualified research” shall include only research conducted in California.

(e) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(f) (1) With respect to any expense paid or incurred after the operative date of Section 6378, Section 41(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified research expenses, is modified to exclude from the definition of “qualified research expense” any amount paid or incurred for tangible personal property
 that is eligible for the exemption from sales or use tax provided by Section 6378.

(2) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998, the reference to “Section 501(a)” in Section 41(b)(3)(C)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified research consortium, is modified to read “this part or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).”

(g) (1) (A) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2025, the election of alternative incremental credit under Section 41(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, as applicable for state purposes, shall apply as that section was in effect on January 1, 2015, and as modified as follows:

(i) The reference to “3 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “one and forty-nine hundredths of one percent.”

(ii) The reference to “4 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “one and ninety-eight hundredths of one percent.”

(iii) The reference to “5 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “two and forty-eight
 hundredths of one percent.”

(B) Section 41(c)(4)(B) shall not apply and in lieu thereof an election under Section 41(c)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made for any taxable year of the taxpayer beginning on or after January 1, 1998, and before January 1, 2025. That election shall apply to the taxable year for which made and all succeeding taxable years beginning before January 1, 2025, unless revoked with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board. 

(2) (A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, Section 41(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election of alternative simplified credit, shall apply, and is modified as follows:

(i) The reference to “14
 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “3 percent.”

(ii) The reference to “6 percent” in Section 41(c)(4)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to read “1.3 percent.”

(B) Section 41(c)(4)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply and in lieu thereof an election under Section 41(c)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made for any taxable year of the taxpayer beginning on or after January 1, 2025. That election shall apply to the taxable year for which made and all succeeding taxable years unless revoked with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(h) Section 41(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to gross receipts, is modified to take into account
 only those gross receipts from the sale of property held primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course of the taxpayer’s trade or business that is delivered or shipped to a purchaser within this state, regardless of f.o.b. point or any other condition of the sale. 

(i) Section 41(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 treatment of credit for qualified small businesses, shall not apply.

(j) Section 41(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for passthrough of credit, is modified by each of the following:

(1) The last sentence shall not apply.

(2) If the amount determined under Section 41(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for any taxable year exceeds the limitation of Section 41(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, that amount may be carried over to other taxable years under the rules of subdivision (e); except that the limitation of Section 41(g) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be taken into account in each subsequent taxable year.

(k) Section
 41(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(l) Section 41(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amounts paid to eligible small businesses, universities, and federal laboratories, shall not apply.

(m) Section 41(f)(6), relating to energy research consortium, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.2.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, a foster youth tax credit to a qualified taxpayer, in an amount as determined under paragraph (2).

(2) (A) The amount of the foster youth tax credit shall be equal to one thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($1,176), multiplied by the earned income tax credit adjustment factor for the taxable year, as specified in Section 17052.

(B) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the amount in subparagraph (A) shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets
 under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(C) (i) The foster youth tax credit shall be reduced by twenty dollars ($20) for each one hundred dollars ($100), or fraction thereof, by which the qualified taxpayer’s earned income, as defined in Section 17052, exceeds the threshold amount.

(ii) (I) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i) shall be recomputed in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041, except that for purposes of this clause, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041 shall be modified by substituting “nearest cent” for “nearest one dollar ($1).”

(II) For taxable years beginning after the taxable
 year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, and before January 1, 2024, the amount calculated under subclause (I) shall substitute for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).

(III) The Franchise Tax Board shall calculate a graduated reduction amount in such a manner that, for a qualified taxpayer with earned income of one dollar ($1) or more in excess of the maximum earned income that results in a credit amount greater than zero dollars ($0) pursuant to Section 17052, the amount of the credit under this section is equal to zero. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the graduated reduction amount calculated pursuant to this
 subclause shall be substituted for the twenty dollars ($20) in clause (i).

(iii) For taxable years beginning after the taxable year in which the minimum wage, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, is set at fifteen dollars ($15) per hour, the threshold amount shall be recomputed annually in the same manner as the recomputation of income tax brackets under subdivision (h) of Section 17041.

(b) The foster youth tax credit authorized by this section shall only be operative for taxable years for which resources are authorized in the annual Budget Act for the Franchise Tax Board to oversee and audit returns associated with the earned income tax credit allowed under Section 17052.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall
 apply:

(1) “Qualified taxpayer,” means an individual who satisfies all of the following:

(A) Has been allowed a tax credit under Section 17052 for the taxable year.

(B) Is 18 to 25 years of age, inclusive, as of the last day of the taxable year.

(C) Was in foster care while 13 years of age or older in an AFDC-FC placement, as described in Section 11402 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program eligible placement, as described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 11450) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, by a Title IV-E agency, pursuant to a voluntary
 placement agreement or a juvenile court order.

(2) “Threshold amount” shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(3) “Title IV-E agency” means either of the following:

(A) A county child welfare agency or probation department that administers foster care placements under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(B) An Indian tribe, tribal organization, or tribal consortium located in California or with lands that extend into the state that has an agreement with the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to administer foster care placement under Title IV-E of the federal
 Social Security Act (Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(d) (1) As provided for in Section 10850.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and subject to federal approvals or waivers, the State Department of Social Services shall provide to the Franchise Tax Board the data regarding a qualified taxpayer placed by a Title IV-E agency that may be necessary to verify that an individual qualifies for the foster youth tax credit. The data provided shall remain confidential and shall be used only for purposes directly connected with the foster youth tax credit.

(2) In the event federal approval or waivers pursuant to paragraph (1) are not provided, the Franchise Tax Board and the State Department of Social Services shall explore alternative methods to verify foster care status for individuals
 described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) in a manner consistent with state and federal law.

(3) The State Department of Social Services shall seek all appropriate federal waivers or approvals for the implementation of this subdivision as necessary. This subdivision shall be implemented only if necessary federal waivers or approvals are granted.

(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations to prevent improper claims from being filed or improper payments from being made with respect to net earnings from self-employment.

(3) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(f) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section exceeds the tax liability computed under this part for the taxable year, the excess shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account and refunded to the qualified taxpayer.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, amounts refunded pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as the federal earned income refund for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code or amounts of those benefits.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the payment authorized pursuant to this section shall not be taken into account as income, and shall not be taken into account as resources for a period of 12 months from receipt, for purposes of determining the eligibility of such individual, or any other individual, for benefits or assistance or the amount or extent of benefits or assistance under any state or local program not covered in subdivision (g). With respect to a state or local program, this subdivision shall only be implemented to the extent that it does not conflict with federal law relating to that program, and that any required federal approval or waiver is first obtained for that program.

(i) The Legislature finds and declares that, to the extent they are otherwise qualified for a credit under this section, undocumented persons are
 eligible for the tax credit authorized by this section within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(j) (1) In accordance with Section 41, the purpose of the Foster Care Tax Credit is to reduce poverty among California’s young adults who have been in the foster care program. To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, the Franchise Tax Board shall annually prepare a written report on the following:

(A) The number of tax returns claiming the credit.

(B) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Senate Committee on Budget and
 Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate and Assembly Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance, the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Human Services.

(3) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542 under Article 2 (commencing with 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 17.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17052.25.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to 50 percent of the costs paid or incurred by a taxpayer for the adoption of any minor child who is a citizen or legal resident of the United States and was in the custody of a public agency of either this state or a political subdivision of this state. The credit shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per minor child.

(b) “Costs” eligible for the credit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) Fees for required services of either the Department of Social Services or a licensed adoption agency.

(2) Travel and related expenses for the adoptive family that are directly related to the adoption process.

(3) Medical fees and expenses that are not reimbursed by insurance and are directly related to the adoption process.

(c) The credit authorized by this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the decree or order of adoption is entered pursuant to Section 8612 of the Family Code. However, the allowable credit claimed may include any costs of that adoption paid or incurred in any
 prior taxable year.

(d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the total credit of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per minor child is exhausted.

(e) Any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount paid or incurred by the taxpayer upon which the credit is based shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 9.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.5.

(a) (1) For a qualified renter, there shall be allowed a credit against the renter’s “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039. The amount of the credit shall be as follows:

(A) For spouses filing joint returns, heads of household, and surviving spouses, as defined in Section 17046, if adjusted gross income is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, the credit shall be equal to:

(i) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026, one hundred twenty dollars ($120).

(ii) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (k), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026:

(I) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the qualified renter has no dependents, as defined in Section 17056.

(II) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the qualified renter has one or more dependents, as defined in Section 17056.

(B) For other individuals, if adjusted gross income is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less, the credit shall be equal to:

(i) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2026, sixty dollars ($60).

(ii) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (k), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026:

(I) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) if the qualified renter has no dependents, as defined
 in Section 17056.

(II) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the qualified renter has one or more dependents, as defined in Section 17056.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), spouses shall receive only one credit under this section. If the spouses file separate returns, the credit may be taken by either or equally divided between them, except as follows:

(A) If one spouse was a resident for the entire taxable year and the other spouse was a nonresident for part or all of the taxable year, the resident spouse shall be allowed one-half the credit allowed to married persons and the nonresident spouse shall be permitted one-half the credit allowed to married persons, prorated as provided in subdivision (e).

(B) If both spouses were nonresidents for part of
 the taxable year, the credit allowed to married persons shall be divided equally between them subject to the proration provided in subdivision (e).

(b) For spouses, if each spouse maintained a separate place of residence and resided in this state during the entire taxable year, each spouse will be allowed one-half the full credit allowed to married persons provided in subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, a “qualified renter” means an individual who satisfies both of the following:

(1) Was a resident of this state, as defined in Section 17014.

(2) Rented and occupied premises in this state that constituted the individual’s principal place of residence during at least 50 percent of the taxable year.

(d) “Qualified renter” does not include any of the following:

(1) An individual who for more than 50 percent of the taxable year rented and occupied premises that were exempt from property taxes, except that an individual, otherwise qualified, is deemed a qualified renter if the individual or the individual’s landlord pays possessory interest taxes, or the owner of those premises makes payments in lieu of property taxes that are substantially equivalent to property taxes paid on properties of comparable market value.

(2) An individual whose principal place of residence for more than 50 percent of the taxable year is with another person who claimed that individual as a dependent for income tax purposes.

(3) An individual who has been granted or whose spouse
 has been granted the homeowners’ property tax exemption during the taxable year. This paragraph does not apply to an individual whose spouse has been granted the homeowners’ property tax exemption if each spouse maintained a separate residence for the entire taxable year.

(e) An otherwise qualified renter who is a nonresident for any portion of the taxable year shall claim the credits set forth in subdivision (a) at the rate of one-twelfth of those credits for each full month that individual resided within this state during the taxable year.

(f) A person claiming the credit provided in this section shall, as part of that claim, and under penalty of perjury, furnish that information as the Franchise Tax Board prescribes on a form supplied by the board.

(g) The credit provided in this section shall be claimed on
 returns in the form as the Franchise Tax Board may from time to time prescribe.

(h) For purposes of this section, “premises” means a house or a dwelling unit used to provide living accommodations in a building or structure and the land incidental thereto, but does not include land only, unless the dwelling unit is a mobilehome. The credit is not allowed for any taxable year for the rental of land upon which a mobilehome is located if the mobilehome has been granted a homeowners’ exemption under Section 218 in that year.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1998, and applies to any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1998.

(j) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the adjusted gross income amounts set forth in subdivision (a).
 The computation shall be made as follows:

(1) The Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall compute an inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the portion of the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and dividing the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the adjusted gross income amount in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for the preceding taxable year by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting products to the nearest
 one dollar ($1).

(4) In computing the adjusted gross income amounts pursuant to this subdivision, the adjusted gross income amounts provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be twice the amount provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(k) (1) Unless otherwise specified annually in any bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Act, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, the amount of credit under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of, and clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be zero dollars ($0).

(2) For any taxable year for which the amount of the credit under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of, or clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), as applicable, of, paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a) is zero dollars ($0) pursuant to paragraph (1), the credit amounts set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of, or clause (i) of subparagraph (B), as applicable, of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be the credit amounts for a qualified renter for the taxable year.

(l) For the purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The specific goals, purposes, and objectives of this bill are as follows:

(A) To address the housing affordability crisis in California, as millions of Californians, who are disproportionately lower income and people of color, are making difficult decisions about paying for housing at the expense of other costs like food, health care, or childcare, as one in three households do not earn enough money to meet their basic
 needs.

(B) To compensate low- and middle-income renters who are rent burdened by the increasing rates of rent throughout the State of California.

(C) To restructure the credit to reflect the disproportionate burden of high rents on single-parent families.

(D) To stimulate consumer spending and economic growth by providing more disposable income to reinvest in the economy.

(2) To measure whether the credit achieves its intended purpose, for those taxable years for which the amount of credit under clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of, or clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of, paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not zero dollars ($0), the Franchise Tax Board shall prepare a written report on both of the following:

(A) The number of taxpayers claiming the credit.

(B) The average credit amount on tax returns claiming the credit.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide the written report prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) to the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Assembly and Senate Committees on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation, and the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall be due July 1 two years following any taxable year that the credit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) is not equal to zero dollars ($0).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 22, Sec. 65.   (AB 130)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.6.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of wages paid or incurred during the taxable year to each prisoner who is employed in a joint venture program established pursuant to Article 1.5 of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, through agreement with the Director of Corrections. 

(b) The Department of Corrections shall forward annually to the Franchise Tax
 Board a list of all employers certified by the Department of Corrections as active participants in a joint venture program pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2717.1) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code. The list shall include the certified participant’s federal employer identification number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 472, Sec. 6.   Effective October 2, 1991.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 6, 1990, by initiative Prop. 139 (the Prison Inmate Labor Initiative of 1990).)
-------------------------------------------

17053.7.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) an amount equal to 10 percent of the amount of wages paid to each employee who is certified by the Employment Development Department to meet the requirements of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

The credit under this section shall not apply to an individual unless, on or before the day on which that individual begins work for the employer, the employer:

(1) Has received a certification from the Employment Development Department, or

(2) Has requested in writing that certification from the Employment Development Department.

For the purposes of this subdivision, if on or before the day on which the individual begins work for the employer, the individual has received from the Employment Development Department a written preliminary determination that he or she is a member of a targeted group, then the requirement of paragraph (1) or (2) shall be applicable on or before the fifth day on which the individual begins work for the employer.

(b) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) during a taxable year by a taxpayer to the same individual. With respect to each qualified employee, the aggregate credit under this
 section shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(c) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid to an individual:

(1) Who bears any of the relationships described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to the taxpayer; or

(2) Who, if the taxpayer is an estate or trust, is a grantor, beneficiary, or fiduciary of the estate or trust, or is an individual who bears any of the relationships described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of Section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to a grantor, beneficiary, or fiduciary of the estate or trust; or

(3) Who is a dependent (as described in Section 152(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code) of the taxpayer, or, if the taxpayer is an estate or trust,
 of a grantor, beneficiary, or a fiduciary of the estate or trust.

(d) The credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid to an individual if, prior to the hiring date of that individual, that individual has been employed by the employer at any time during which he or she was not certified by the Employment Development Department to meet the requirements of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(e) If the certification of an employment has been revoked pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 328 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the credit under this section shall not apply to wages paid by the employer after the date on which notice of revocation is received by the employer.

(f) The credit under this section shall be in addition to any deduction under this part to which the taxpayer may be
 entitled, if any.

(g) The credit provided by this section shall be applied to wages paid to each qualifying employee during the 24-month period beginning on the date the employee begins working for the taxpayer.

(h) (1) A taxpayer may elect to have this section not apply for any taxable year.

(2) An election under paragraph (1) for any taxable year may be made (or revoked) at any time before the expiration of the four-year period beginning on the last date prescribed by law for filing the return for that taxable year (determined without regard to extensions).

(3) An election under paragraph (1) (or revocation thereof) shall be made in any manner which the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe.

(i) (1) In the case of a successor employer referred to in Section 3306(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, the determination of the amount of the credit under this section with respect to wages paid by that successor employer shall be made in the same manner as if those wages were paid by the predecessor employer referred to in that section.

(2) No credit shall be determined under this section with respect to remuneration paid by an employer to an employee for services performed by that employee for another person, unless the amount reasonably expected to be received by the employer for those services from that other person exceeds the remuneration paid by the employer to that employee for those services.

(j) The term “wages” shall not include either of the following:

(1) Payments defined in Section 51(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to payments for services during labor disputes.

(2) Any amounts paid or incurred to an individual who begins work for the employer after December 31, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 13.5.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.12.

(a) In the case of a taxpayer who transports any agricultural product donated in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039), an amount equal to 50 percent of the transportation costs paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with the transportation of that donated agricultural product.

(b) If any credit allowed by this section is claimed by the taxpayer, any deduction otherwise allowed under this part for that amount of the cost paid or incurred by the taxpayer which is eligible for the credit that is claimed shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed.

(c) Upon delivery of the donated agricultural product by a taxpayer authorized to claim a credit pursuant to subdivision (a), the nonprofit charitable organization shall provide a certificate to the taxpayer who transported the agricultural product. The certificate shall contain a statement signed and dated by a person authorized by that organization that the product is donated under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 58501) of Part 1 of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The certificate shall also contain the following information: the type and quantity of product donated, the distance
 transported, the name of the transporter, the name of the taxpayer donor, and the name and address of the donee. Upon the request of the Franchise Tax Board, the taxpayer shall provide a copy of the certification to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) In the case where any credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 954, Sec. 9.   Effective September 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.30.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to 55 percent of the fair market value of any qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2000, and not later than June 30, 2008, on or after January 1, 2010, and not later than June 30, 2020, and on or after January 1, 2021, and not later than June 30, 2026, by the taxpayer during the taxable year to the state, any local government, or any designated nonprofit organization, pursuant to Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified contribution” means a contribution of property, as defined in Section 37002 of the Public Resources Code, that has been approved for acceptance by the
 Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the fair market value of any qualified contribution approved for acceptance under Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders of the pass-thru entity in accordance with their interest in the pass-thru entity as of the date of the qualified contribution. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership, “S” corporation, or limited liability company treated as a partnership.

(d) (1) For a qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2015, if the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in
 the following year, and the succeeding seven years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(2) For a qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2015, if the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and the succeeding 14 years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) This credit shall be in lieu of any other credit or deduction that the taxpayer may otherwise claim pursuant to this part with respect to the property or any interest therein that is contributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (AB 1219)   Effective September 30, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.40.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2036, there shall be allowed to qualified taxpayer, a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, in an amount equal to 20 percent of the qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) per qualified taxpayer per taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank established under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 63021) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(2) “Eligible transmission project” means a project as defined in Section 63049.71 of the Government Code and that meets the criteria and conditions of Sections 12100.111 and 12100.111.5 of the Government Code.

(3) “Qualified expenditures” means costs paid or incurred for planning, design, engineering, permitting, construction, and equipment directly related to the eligible transmission project or qualified wages paid or incurred to employees of a qualified taxpayer that perform services directly related to the eligible transmission project.

(4) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that is a participating party, as defined in subdivision (i) of section 63049.71 of the Government Code.

(5) “Qualified wages” means wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding seven years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(d) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, a deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer shall be reduced by the
 amount of the qualified expenditures taken into account in calculating the credit allowed by this section.

(e) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, the taxpayer shall not earn a return on equity for the eligible transmission project pursuant to Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 63049.71) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code for the portion of the project for which the credit is claimed.

(f) The bank shall inform the Franchise Tax Board of any eligible transmission project that the bank approves for financial assistance pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 63049.73 of the Government Code and shall provide any other information the Franchise Tax Board requires for administration of the credit allowed by this section.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may
 prescribe regulations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(h) Section 41 shall not apply to this section.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 258, Sec. 9.   (AB 192)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2036, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.42.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1996, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, the amount paid or incurred for eligible access expenditures. The credit shall be allowed in accordance with Section 44 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expenditures to provide access to disabled individuals, except that the credit amount specified in subdivision (b) shall be substituted for the credit amount specified in Section 44(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The credit amount allowed under this section shall be 50 percent of so much of the eligible access expenditures for the taxable year as do not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 954, Sec. 11.   Effective September 26, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17053.64.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed a credit against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, to a qualified taxpayer equal to 25 percent of the total amount of the qualified taxpayer’s qualified expenditures in the taxable year, subject to paragraph (2).
